Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND 2 Section 1. REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ 3 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 4 infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 to the following 5 state entities for the following fiscal years, the following 6 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 7 purposes designated: 8 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES 9 a. For the demolition of the fleet building located at 307 10 East Seventh Street, Des Moines, Iowa, notwithstanding section 11 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 12 FY 2025-2026: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 14 b. For maintenance projects at the state historical 15 building: 16 FY 2025-2026: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 18 2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 19 a. (1) For deposit in the water quality initiative fund 20 created in section 466B.45 for purposes of supporting the 21 water quality initiative administered by the division of soil 22 conservation and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , 23 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph 25 âcâ: 26 FY 2025-2026: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,200,000 28 (2) (a) The moneys appropriated in this lettered 29 paragraph shall be used to support demonstration projects in 30 subwatersheds as designated by the department that are part 31 of high-priority watersheds identified by the water resources 32 coordinating council. 33 (b) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 34 shall be used to support demonstration projects in watersheds 35 -1- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 1/ 24 S.F. _____ generally, including regional watersheds, as designated by the 1 division, and high-priority watersheds identified by the water 2 resources coordinating council. 3 (3) In supporting projects in watersheds and subwatersheds 4 as provided in subparagraph (2), all of the following apply: 5 (a) The demonstration projects must utilize water quality 6 practices as described in the latest revision of the document 7 entitled âIowa Nutrient Reduction Strategyâ initially presented 8 in November 2012 by the department of agriculture and land 9 stewardship, the department of natural resources, and Iowa 10 state university of science and technology. 11 (b) The division shall implement demonstration projects 12 as provided in subparagraph division (a) by providing 13 for participation by persons who hold a legal interest in 14 agricultural land used in farming. To every extent practical, 15 the division shall provide for collaborative participation by 16 such persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land 17 located within the same subwatershed. 18 (c) The division shall implement demonstration projects on 19 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. Except for 20 edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the amount shall 21 not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of establishing the 22 practice as determined by the division or 50 percent of the 23 actual cost of establishing the practice, whichever is less. 24 (d) The demonstration projects shall be used to educate 25 other persons about the feasibility and value of establishing 26 similar water quality practices. The division shall promote 27 field day events for purposes of allowing interested persons to 28 establish water quality practices on such personsâ agricultural 29 land. 30 (e) The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 31 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 32 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 33 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 34 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 35 -2- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 2/ 24 S.F. _____ legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 1 land shall be a confidential record. 2 (4) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 3 shall be used to support education and outreach in a manner 4 that encourages persons who hold a legal interest in 5 agricultural land used for farming to implement water quality 6 practices, including the establishment of such practices in 7 watersheds generally, and not limited to subwatersheds or 8 high-priority watersheds. 9 (5) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 10 may be used to contract with persons to coordinate the 11 implementation of efforts provided in this lettered paragraph. 12 (6) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 13 may be used by the department to support urban soil and water 14 conservation efforts, which may include but are not limited 15 to management practices related to bioretention, landscaping, 16 the use of permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality 17 restoration. The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share 18 basis as provided in chapter 161A . 19 (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 20 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in this 21 lettered paragraph to carry out the provisions of this lettered 22 paragraph on a cost-share basis in combination with other 23 moneys available to the department from a state or federal 24 source. 25 (8) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 26 this lettered paragraph may be used for costs of administration 27 and implementation of the water quality initiative administered 28 by the division. 29 b. For deposit in the renewable fuel infrastructure fund 30 created in section 159A.16 for renewable fuel infrastructure 31 programs: 32 FY 2025-2026: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 34 The appropriation made in this lettered paragraph is in lieu 35 -3- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 3/ 24 S.F. _____ of the standing appropriation from the general fund of the 1 state in section 159A.17 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2 2025, which shall be zero. 3 c. For updating the maximum return to nitrogen modeling 4 system for fertilizer management, notwithstanding section 8.57, 5 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 6 FY 2025-2026: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 8 Any information received, collected, or held for purposes 9 of this lettered paragraph is a confidential record exempt 10 from public release if the information identifies a person 11 who holds a legal interest in agricultural land or who has 12 previously held a legal interest in agricultural land, a person 13 who is involved or who was previously involved in managing 14 the agricultural land or producing crops or livestock on 15 the agricultural land, or the identifiable location of the 16 agricultural land. 17 3. DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 18 For building repairs for the building located at 524 Fourth 19 Street, Des Moines, Iowa: 20 FY 2025-2026: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 559,000 22 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 23 For the renovation and construction of a central office for 24 community-based corrections located in district 4: 25 FY 2025-2026: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,163,847 27 FY 2026-2027: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,775,898 29 5. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 30 a. For deposit in the community attraction and tourism 31 fund created in section 15F.204, notwithstanding section 8.57, 32 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 33 FY 2025-2026: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,000,000 35 -4- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 4/ 24 S.F. _____ b. For deposit in the destination Iowa fund created in 1 section 15.281, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 2 paragraph âcâ: 3 FY 2025-2026: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,000,000 5 c. For equal distribution to regional sports authority 6 districts certified by the authority pursuant to section 7 15E.321, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph 8 âcâ: 9 FY 2025-2026: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 11 d. For deposit in the Iowa major events and tourism fund 12 established in section 15G.104, as enacted by this Act, 13 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 14 FY 2025-2026: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,000,000 16 6. IOWA COMMUNICATIONS NETWORK 17 For the construction of a network redundancy at the joint 18 forces headquarters, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 19 3, paragraph âcâ: 20 FY 2025-2026: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 22 7. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY 23 For the construction of a driving training facility: 24 FY 2025-2026: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,000,000 26 8. IOWA STATE FAIR AUTHORITY 27 For the construction of an agriculture education facility: 28 FY 2025-2026: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,700,000 30 FY 2026-2027: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,300,000 32 9. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 33 a. For implementation of lake projects that have 34 established watershed improvement initiatives and community 35 -5- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 5/ 24 S.F. _____ support in accordance with the departmentâs annual lake 1 restoration plan and report, notwithstanding section 8.57, 2 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 3 FY 2025-2026: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,600,000 5 b. For state park infrastructure improvements: 6 FY 2025-2026: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 8 c. For water trails and low head dam safety grants, 9 including grants for projects relating to eligible water 10 bodies, as defined in section 456A.33C, notwithstanding section 11 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 12 FY 2025-2026: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 14 10. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE 15 a. For major maintenance projects at national guard 16 armories and facilities: 17 FY 2025-2026: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 19 b. For improvement projects for Iowa national guard 20 installations and readiness centers to support operations and 21 training requirements: 22 FY 2025-2026: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 24 c. For construction improvement projects at the Camp Dodge 25 facility: 26 FY 2025-2026: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 550,000 28 d. The department of public defense shall report to the 29 general assembly by December 15, 2025, regarding the projects 30 the department has funded or intends to fund from moneys 31 appropriated to the department pursuant to this subsection. 32 11. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 33 a. For payments and other costs due under a financing 34 agreement entered into by the treasurer of state for building 35 -6- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 6/ 24 S.F. _____ the statewide interoperable communications system pursuant to 1 section 29C.23, subsection 2, notwithstanding section 8.57, 2 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 3 FY 2025-2026: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,486,177 5 b. For deposit in the public safety equipment fund created 6 in section 80.48, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 7 paragraph âcâ: 8 FY 2025-2026: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 10 12. BOARD OF REGENTS 11 a. For allocation by the state board of regents to the 12 state university of Iowa, Iowa state university of science 13 and technology, and the university of northern Iowa to 14 reimburse the institutions for deficiencies in the operating 15 funds resulting from the pledging of tuition, student fees 16 and charges, and institutional income to finance the cost of 17 providing academic and administrative buildings and facilities 18 and utility services at the institutions: 19 FY 2025-2026: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,600,000 21 b. For the renovation and construction of the public policy 22 center at the commons at the university of northern Iowa: 23 FY 2025-2026: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,100,000 25 13. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 26 a. For acquiring, constructing, and improving recreational 27 trails within the state: 28 FY 2025-2026: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,200,000 30 b. For deposit in the public transit infrastructure grant 31 fund created in section 324A.6A, for projects that meet 32 the definition of vertical infrastructure in section 8.57, 33 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 34 FY 2025-2026: 35 -7- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 7/ 24 S.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,200,000 1 c. For deposit in the railroad revolving loan and grant 2 fund created in section 327H.20A, notwithstanding section 8.57, 3 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 4 FY 2025-2026: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,700,000 6 d. For vertical infrastructure improvements at the 7 commercial service airports within the state: 8 FY 2025-2026: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,600,000 10 e. For vertical infrastructure improvements at general 11 aviation airports within the state: 12 FY 2025-2026: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 14 14. TREASURER OF STATE 15 For distribution in accordance with chapter 174 to qualified 16 fairs that belong to the association of Iowa fairs for county 17 fair vertical infrastructure improvements: 18 FY 2025-2026: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,060,000 20 Sec. 2. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 21 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 22 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 23 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 24 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 25 ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 26 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 27 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 28 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 29 the close of that same fiscal year. 30 DIVISION II 31 TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND 32 Sec. 3. TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND. There is 33 appropriated from the technology reinvestment fund created in 34 section 8.57C to the following state entities for the fiscal 35 -8- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 8/ 24 S.F. _____ year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 1 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 2 used for the purposes designated: 3 1. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 4 a. For camera system upgrades: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 6 b. For Anamosa state penitentiary security fence upgrades: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 546,700 8 c. For the Anamosa state penitentiary computer backup 9 system: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,000 11 d. For Anamosa state penitentiary building automation 12 system upgrades: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 832,033 14 e. For Fort Dodge correctional facility sodium hydroxide 15 skid and pH analyzer system replacement: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,777 17 f. For Fort Dodge correctional facility battery backup 18 system replacement: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,000 20 g. For replacement and expansion of personal data 21 assistants used at the Iowa correctional institution for women: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 46,725 23 h. For Iowa correctional institution for women door control 24 replacements: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 60,602 26 i. For staff tracking and identification systems at 27 corrections institutions: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 244,129 29 j. For north central correctional facility at Rockwell City 30 phone system upgrades: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,500 32 k. For body cameras at corrections institutions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 34 2. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 35 -9- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 9/ 24 S.F. _____ For the purchase of an enterprise management system: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,375,000 2 3. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 3 a. For the continued development and implementation of an 4 educational data warehouse that will be utilized by teachers, 5 parents, school district administrators, area education agency 6 staff, department of education staff, and policymakers: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 8 Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, the 9 department may use a portion for an e-transcript data system 10 capable of tracking students throughout the studentsâ education 11 via interconnectivity with multiple schools. 12 b. For maintenance and lease costs associated with 13 connections for part III of the Iowa communications network: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,727,000 15 4. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT 16 For the continued implementation of a statewide mass 17 notification and emergency messaging system: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 19 5. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT 20 a. For the continued development and implementation of 21 a searchable database that can be placed on the internet for 22 budget and financial information: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,000 24 b. For the continued development and implementation of the 25 comprehensive electronic grant management system: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 70,000 27 c. For the upgrade of the local government budget and 28 property tax system: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 30 d. For the annual licensing of a searchable database that is 31 placed on the internet for budget and financial information: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 358,429 33 e. For the security office of the chief information 34 officer, including for statewide endpoint detection and 35 -10- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 10/ 24 S.F. _____ response, cybersecurity incident investigation response, and 1 miscellaneous purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,947,658 3 f. For the cost of equipment and computer software for the 4 continued development and implementation of Iowaâs criminal 5 justice information system: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,400,000 7 g. For the costs associated with the justice enterprise data 8 warehouse: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 282,664 10 h. For the costs associated with the justice enterprise data 11 warehouse transition: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 290,000 13 6. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE 14 For the purchase of software relating to state active-duty 15 tracking and for data conversion costs associated with 16 migrating technology platforms: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220,000 18 7. TREASURER OF STATE 19 a. For the ongoing costs associated with software used for 20 investment tracking: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 192,000 22 b. For the ongoing costs associated with software used for 23 banking reconciliations: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 228,000 25 Sec. 4. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 26 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 27 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 28 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 29 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 30 ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 31 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 32 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 33 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 34 the close of that same fiscal year. 35 -11- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 11/ 24 S.F. _____ Sec. 5. Section 8.57C, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 3. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 3 state to the technology reinvestment fund for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and for each subsequent fiscal 5 year thereafter, the sum of seventeen million five hundred 6 thousand dollars. 7 b. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 8 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 9 2023 2025 , and ending June 30, 2024 2026 , the sum of eighteen 10 million three hundred ninety thousand two hundred ninety 11 eighteen million one hundred forty-seven thousand two hundred 12 ninety-five dollars to the technology reinvestment fund, 13 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 14 c. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 15 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, 16 and ending June 30, 2025, the sum of twenty-one million one 17 hundred thirty-one thousand eight hundred seventy-three dollars 18 to the technology reinvestment fund, notwithstanding section 19 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 20 DIVISION III 21 CHANGES TO PRIOR APPROPRIATIONS 22 Sec. 6. 2021 Iowa Acts, chapter 167, section 2, as amended 23 by 2023 Iowa Acts, chapter 118, section 6, and 2024 Iowa Acts, 24 chapter 1155, section 7, is amended to read as follows: 25 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 26 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, for purposes 27 of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided otherwise, 28 unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made 29 in this division of this Act shall not revert but shall remain 30 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 31 close of the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of 32 the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 33 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 34 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 35 -12- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 12/ 24 S.F. _____ or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 1 fiscal year. 2 2. a. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 3 provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated moneys from 4 an appropriation made in section 1, subsection 10, paragraph 5 âdâ, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, as amended by 2022 6 Iowa Acts, chapter 1150, section 11 , shall not revert but shall 7 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 8 until the project for which the appropriation was made is 9 completed. 10 b. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or 11 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 12 subsection 4, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, shall 13 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 14 purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 15 ends three four years after the end of the fiscal year for 16 which the appropriation is made, or until the project for which 17 the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 18 c. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or 19 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 20 subsection 16, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, as 21 amended by this 2024 Iowa Act, shall not revert but shall 22 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 23 until the close of the fiscal year that ends three four years 24 after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is 25 made, or until the project for which the appropriation was made 26 is completed, whichever is earlier. 27 Sec. 7. 2022 Iowa Acts, chapter 1150, section 2, as amended 28 by 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 9, is amended to read 29 as follows: 30 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 31 1. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 32 provided in subsection 2 or otherwise, unencumbered or 33 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division 34 of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for 35 -13- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 13/ 24 S.F. _____ expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 1 the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the 2 fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 3 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 4 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 5 or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 6 fiscal year. 7 2. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or 8 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 9 subsection 4, of this division of this 2022 Iowa Act, shall 10 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 11 purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 12 ends three four years after the end of the fiscal year for 13 which the appropriation is made, or until the project for which 14 the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 15 Sec. 8. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 1, subsection 16 1, paragraph b, is amended to read as follows: 17 b. For major maintenance projects at the Iowa state capitol 18 and for signage on capitol complex grounds : 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 20 (1) Of the amount appropriated in this paragraph, the 21 department of administrative services shall allocate and use 22 the moneys necessary to improve and repair the steps on the 23 west side of the exterior of the capitol building and for 24 projects on the east side of the exterior of the capitol 25 building , as directed by the legislative branch, by the close 26 of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2024 2025 . 27 (2) Of the amount appropriated in this paragraph, the 28 department of administrative services shall allocate and use 29 not more than $100,000 to purchase and erect signs on the state 30 capitol complex grounds, as directed by the legislative branch, 31 by the close of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2025. 32 Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 33 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 34 DIVISION IV 35 -14- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 14/ 24 S.F. _____ DISTRICT COURT FURNISHINGS 1 Sec. 10. Section 602.1303, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 2 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. A county shall provide furnishings for 4 the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff. 5 Sec. 11. Section 602.11101, subsection 1, paragraph e, 6 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 (2) (a) Until July 1, 1986, the county shall remain 8 responsible for the compensation of and operating costs for 9 court employees not presently designated for state financing 10 and for miscellaneous costs of the judicial branch related to 11 furnishings, supplies, and equipment purchased, leased, or 12 maintained for the use of judicial officers, referees, and 13 their staff. 14 (b) Effective July 1, 1986, except as provided in 15 subparagraph division (c) or (d), as applicable, the state 16 shall assume the responsibility for the compensation of and 17 operating costs for court employees presently designated for 18 state financing and for miscellaneous costs of the judicial 19 branch related to furnishings, supplies, and equipment 20 purchased, leased, or maintained for the use of judicial 21 officers, referees, and their staff. However, the county 22 shall at all times remain responsible for the provision of 23 suitable courtrooms, offices, and other physical facilities 24 pursuant to section 602.1303, subsection 1 , including paint, 25 wall covering, and fixtures in the facilities. In addition, 26 however, effective 27 (c) Effective July 1, 2023, except as provided in 28 subparagraph division (d), if a county expends moneys for the 29 renovation or construction of suitable courtrooms, offices, and 30 other physical facilities pursuant to section 602.1303 , that 31 requires the purchase of furnishings, supplies, and equipment 32 for the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff as 33 a result of that renovation or construction, the state shall be 34 responsible for only seventy-five percent of the cost of the 35 -15- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 15/ 24 S.F. _____ purchase. 1 (d) Effective July 1, 2025, the state is not responsible 2 for the cost of furnishings purchased, leased, or maintained 3 for the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff in 4 physical facilities described in section 602.1303, subsection 5 1. 6 DIVISION V 7 IOWA MAJOR EVENTS AND TOURISM PROGRAM AND FUND 8 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 15G.101 Definitions. 9 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 10 requires: 11 1. âBoardâ means the same as defined in section 15.102. 12 2. âEntityâ means an Iowa nonprofit organization established 13 to promote economic development and tourism in an area. 14 3. âEventâ means a tourism-oriented athletic contest, 15 convention, music festival, or art festival. 16 4. âFinancial assistanceâ means assistance provided only 17 from the funds, rights, and assets legally available to the 18 authority and includes but is not limited to assistance in the 19 form of grants. 20 5. âFundâ means the Iowa major events and tourism fund 21 established in section 15G.104. 22 6. âProgramâ means the Iowa major events and tourism program 23 established in section 15G.102. 24 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 15G.102 Iowa major events and tourism 25 program ââ purpose. 26 1. The authority shall establish and administer the 27 Iowa major events and tourism program to provide financial 28 assistance to eligible entities that support events in this 29 state, or support events involving a geographic region that 30 includes this state, and the event generates large attendance, 31 significant publicity, and has a measurable economic impact on 32 this state. 33 2. The program shall be administered for the purpose of 34 awarding financial assistance to an eligible entity for any of 35 -16- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 16/ 24 S.F. _____ the following purposes: 1 a. To pay for or reimburse the costs incurred by the entity 2 to apply or bid for selection as the site for the event. 3 b. To pay for or reimburse the costs incurred by the entity 4 to plan or to conduct the event, including any fees charged by 5 a site selection organization as a prerequisite to hosting the 6 event, including but not limited to hosting fees, sanctioning 7 fees, participation fees, operational fees, or bid fees. 8 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 15G.103 Program ââ application, 9 review, eligibility, and funding. 10 1. An application for financial assistance under the 11 program shall be submitted to the authority. For each 12 application that meets the eligibility criteria under 13 subsection 2, the authority shall conduct a staff evaluation 14 of the application and forward the application and staff 15 evaluation to the board. 16 2. a. The authority shall establish eligibility criteria 17 for the program by rule. The eligibility criteria must include 18 all of the following: 19 (1) The entity must currently be involved in the bidding and 20 selection process for the event for which the entity submits 21 an application. 22 (2) The entityâs application under subsection 1 must 23 include an economic analysis of the event that includes but is 24 not limited to all of the following: 25 (a) Projected hotel and motel room occupancies during the 26 event. 27 (b) Projected number of event attendees from this state, 28 other states, and other countries. 29 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , an entity shall be deemed 30 eligible for the program if any of the following apply: 31 (1) After a highly competitive bidding and selection 32 process involving potential sites not located in this state, a 33 location in Iowa has been selected for the entityâs event. 34 (2) This state serves as the sole site for the entityâs 35 -17- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 17/ 24 S.F. _____ event. 1 (3) The sole site for the entityâs event is a geographical 2 region that includes this state and one or more contiguous 3 states. 4 3. When evaluating an application, the authority shall 5 consider, at a minimum, all of the following: 6 a. The potential impact of the event on the local, regional, 7 and state economies. 8 b. The eventâs potential to attract visitors from this 9 state, other states, and other countries. 10 c. The amount of positive advertising or media coverage the 11 event may generate. 12 d. The quality, size, and scope of the event. 13 e. The ratio of public-to-private investment required for 14 the event. 15 4. a. (1) Upon review of the staff evaluation, the board 16 shall make the final funding decision on each application 17 and may approve, deny, defer, or modify each application, in 18 the boardâs discretion, to fund as many events as possible 19 with the moneys available. The board and the authority may 20 negotiate with an eligible applicant regarding the details of 21 the applicantâs proposed event and the amount and terms of 22 any financial assistance. In making final funding decisions 23 pursuant to this subsection, the board and the authority shall 24 be exempt from chapter 17A. 25 (2) An application and staff evaluation forwarded to 26 the board under subsection 1 shall remain eligible for 27 consideration by the board under subparagraph (1) for up to two 28 years from the date of receipt of the application by the board. 29 b. In order to be awarded financial assistance under the 30 program, an applicant must demonstrate the ability to provide 31 matching funds for the event that equal at least fifty percent 32 of the award of financial assistance. 33 Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 15G.104 Iowa major events and tourism 34 fund. 35 -18- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 18/ 24 S.F. _____ 1. a. The authority shall establish an Iowa major events 1 and tourism fund pursuant to section 15.106A, subsection 1, 2 paragraph âoâ , for purposes of providing financial assistance 3 as described in this chapter. The fund may be administered as 4 a revolving fund and shall consist of any moneys transferred to 5 the fund and any moneys appropriated by the general assembly 6 for purposes of this chapter. 7 b. (1) Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated 8 in this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 9 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 10 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 11 close of the fiscal year following the succeeding fiscal year. 12 (2) Moneys encumbered or obligated pursuant to financial 13 assistance awarded under section 15G.103, subsection 4, shall 14 be disbursed by the authority within five calendar years from 15 the date of encumbrance or obligation, or the moneys shall 16 revert to the state treasury and shall be credited to the funds 17 from which the appropriations were made as provided in section 18 8.33. 19 c. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 20 earnings on moneys deposited in the fund shall be credited to 21 the fund. 22 2. a. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the authority 23 for purposes of providing financial assistance under the 24 program. The authority shall not use more than five percent 25 of the moneys in the fund at the beginning of each fiscal year 26 for purposes of administrative costs, technical assistance, and 27 other program support. 28 b. An entity that is awarded financial assistance pursuant 29 to this chapter is not eligible to receive financial assistance 30 under the sports tourism infrastructure program pursuant to 31 chapter 15F, subchapter IV. 32 DIVISION VI 33 SPORTS TOURISM MARKETING PROGRAM AND FUND ââ REPEAL 34 Sec. 16. Section 15F.401, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 35 -19- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 19/ 24 S.F. _____ 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1 a. The authority shall establish, and, at the direction 2 of the board, shall administer a sports tourism marketing and 3 infrastructure program to provide financial assistance for 4 projects that promote sporting events or for infrastructure 5 projects supporting sporting events for organizations of 6 accredited colleges and universities, professional sporting 7 events, and other sporting events in the state. 8 Sec. 17. Section 15F.401, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 9 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 10 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (03) âFundâ means the sports tourism 11 infrastructure program fund established in section 15F.404. 12 Sec. 18. Section 15F.401, subsection 2, paragraph a, 13 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 14 subparagraph. 15 Sec. 19. Section 15F.401, subsection 2, paragraph a, 16 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 17 (2) A city or county in the state , or a public entity 18 that is a convention and visitors bureau or a district 19 nonprofit organization, may apply to the authority be 20 eligible for financial assistance from the sports tourism 21 infrastructure program fund created in section 15F.404 fund for 22 an infrastructure project that actively and directly supports 23 sporting events for accredited colleges and universities, 24 professional sporting events, and other sporting events in the 25 area served by the city, county, or public entity. However, 26 financial assistance shall not be provided to an applicant a 27 public entity that is a nonprofit organization from the sports 28 tourism infrastructure program fund created in section 15F.404 29 fund for infrastructure projects located in a reinvestment 30 district as defined and approved by the authority pursuant to 31 section 15J.4 or to applicants that have received a rebate 32 of sales tax imposed and collected by retailers pursuant to 33 section 423.4, subsection 5 . 34 Sec. 20. Section 15F.401, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 35 -20- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 20/ 24 S.F. _____ 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1 b. An applicant under the program shall not receive 2 financial assistance from the sports tourism marketing 3 program fund created in section 15F.403 or the sports tourism 4 infrastructure program fund created in section 15F.404 fund 5 in an amount exceeding fifty percent of the total cost of the 6 project. 7 Sec. 21. Section 15F.401, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 5. The board shall make final funding decisions on 10 each application and may approve, deny, defer, or modify 11 applications for financial assistance under the sports tourism 12 marketing and infrastructure program, in its discretion, in 13 order to fund as many projects with the moneys available as 14 possible. The board and the authority may negotiate with 15 applicants regarding the details of projects and the amount and 16 terms of any award. The total amount of financial assistance 17 provided to an applicant from the sports tourism marketing 18 program fund created in section 15F.403 in any one fiscal year 19 shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars. In making 20 final funding decisions pursuant to this subsection , the board 21 and the authority are exempt from chapter 17A . 22 Sec. 22. Section 15F.401, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 23 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 24 thereof the following: 25 6. A city, county, or public entity shall not use financial 26 assistance received under the program from the fund as 27 reimbursement for completed projects. 28 Sec. 23. Section 15F.402, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2025, 29 are amended to read as follows: 30 1. Applications for assistance under the sports tourism 31 marketing and infrastructure program established in section 32 15F.401 shall be submitted to the authority. For those 33 applications that meet the eligibility criteria, the authority 34 shall forward the applications to the board and provide a staff 35 -21- LSB 1008XC (6) 91 th/ns 21/ 24 S.F. _____ review analysis and evaluation to the sports tourism program 1 review committee referred to in subsection 2 and to the board. 2 2. A review committee composed of five members of the 3 board shall review sports tourism marketing and infrastructure 4 program applications forwarded to the board and make 5 recommendations regarding the applications to the authority. 6 Sec. 24. Section 15F.404, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 7 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the authority for 9 purposes of providing financial assistance to cities, counties, 10 and eligible public entities under the sports tourism marketing 11 and infrastructure program established and administered 12 pursuant to this subchapter . 13 Sec. 25. REPEAL. Section 15F.403, Code 2025, is repealed. 14 Sec. 26. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. On the effective date of 15 this division of this Act, any moneys remaining in the sports 16 tourism marketing program fund in section 15F.403, Code 2025, 17 shall be transferred to the Iowa major events tourism fund 18 established in section 15G.104, as enacted in this Act. 19